Utah statutes.
78B-19-114.   Authority of tribunal in case of noncompliance.

(1)  If an agreement fails to meet the requirements of Section 78B-19-104, or a lawyer fails to comply with Section 78B-19-111 or 78B-19-112, a tribunal may nonetheless find that the parties intended to enter into a collaborative law participation agreement if they:

(a)  signed a record indicating an intention to enter into a collaborative law participation agreement; and

(b)  reasonably believed they were participating in a collaborative law process.

(2)  If a court makes the findings specified in Subsection (1), and the interests of justice require, the court may:

(a)  enforce an agreement evidenced by a record resulting from the process in which the parties participated;

(b)  apply the disqualification provisions of Sections 78B-19-105 and 78B-19-106; and

(c)  apply the privileges in the Utah Rules of Evidence.



Enacted by Chapter 382, 2010 General Session

